California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(h) Review of the drugs contained within, and the operation and maintenance of, the automated patient dispensing system shall be done in accordance with law and shall be the responsibility of the pharmacy. A pharmacist shall conduct the review on a monthly basis, which shall include a physical inspection of the drugs in the automated patient dispensing system, an inspection of the automated patient dispensing system machine for cleanliness, and a review of all transaction
 records in order to verify the security and accountability of the system.

(i) A pharmacy holding an automated patient dispensing system license shall complete a self-assessment, performed pursuant to Section 1715 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations, evaluating the pharmacy’s compliance with pharmacy law relating to the use of the automated patient dispensing system. All information regarding operation, maintenance, compliance, error, omissions, or complaints pertaining to the automated patient dispensing system shall be included in the self-assessment.

(j) The pharmacy shall comply with all recordkeeping and quality assurance requirements pursuant to this chapter, and shall maintain those records within the pharmacy holding the automated patient dispensing system
 license and separately from other pharmacy records.

(k) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 723, Sec. 7.   (SB 816)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacy may furnish epinephrine delivery systems to a local educational agency pursuant to Section 49414 of the Education Code if all of the following are met:

(1) The epinephrine delivery systems are furnished exclusively for use at a local educational agency, as that term is defined in Section 49414 of the Education Code, including at any state or federally subsidized childcare program operated by or under contract with the local educational agency.

(2) A physician and surgeon provides a written order that specifies the quantity of epinephrine delivery systems to be furnished.

(b) Records regarding the acquisition and disposition of epinephrine delivery systems furnished pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be maintained by the local educational agency for a period of three years from the date the records were created. The local educational agency shall be responsible for monitoring the supply of epinephrine delivery systems and ensuring the destruction of expired epinephrine delivery systems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 322, Sec. 1.   (SB 568)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.3.

(a) A pharmacy may, at a patient’s request, repackage a drug previously dispensed to the patient or to the patient’s agent pursuant to a prescription.

(b) Any pharmacy providing repackaging services shall have in place policies and procedures for repackaging these drugs and shall label the repackaged prescription container with the following:

(1) All the information required by Section 4076.

(2) The name and address of the pharmacy repackaging the drug and the name and address of the pharmacy that initially dispensed the drug to the patient.

(c) The repackaging pharmacy and the pharmacy that initially dispensed the drug shall only be liable for its own actions in providing the drug to the patient or the patient’s agent.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 4052.7 by Stats. 2025, Ch. 196, Sec. 20.   (AB 1503)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacy may furnish epinephrine auto-injectors to an authorized entity, for the purpose of rendering emergency care in accordance with Section 1797.197a of the Health and Safety Code, if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The epinephrine auto-injectors are furnished exclusively for use by, or in connection with, an authorized entity.

(2) An authorized health care provider provides a prescription that specifies the quantity of epinephrine auto-injectors to be furnished to an authorized entity described in subdivision (a) of Section 1797.197a of the Health and Safety Code. A new prescription
 shall be written for any additional epinephrine auto-injectors required for use.

(b) The pharmacy shall label each epinephrine auto-injector dispensed with all of the following:

(1) The name of the person or entity to whom the prescription was issued.

(2) The designations “Section 1797.197a Responder” and “First Aid Purposes Only.”

(3) The dosage, use, and expiration date.

(c) Each dispensed prescription shall include the manufacturer’s product information sheet for the epinephrine auto-injector.

(d) Records regarding the acquisition and disposition of epinephrine auto-injectors furnished pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be
 maintained by the authorized entity for a period of three years from the date the records were created. The authorized entity shall be responsible for monitoring the supply of epinephrine auto-injectors and ensuring the destruction of expired epinephrine auto-injectors.

(e) The epinephrine auto-injector dispensed pursuant to this section may be used only for the purpose, and under the circumstances, described in Section 1797.197a of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, “epinephrine auto-injector” means a disposable delivery device designed for the automatic injection of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body to prevent or treat a life-threatening allergic reaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 374, Sec. 1.   (AB 1386)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.5.

(a) A pharmacy can transfer a reasonable supply of dangerous drugs to another pharmacy.

(b) A pharmacy may repackage and furnish to a prescriber a reasonable quantity of dangerous drugs and dangerous devices for prescriber office use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 549, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.6.

An intern pharmacist under the direct supervision and control, as defined in Section 4023.5, of a pharmacist may stock, replenish, and inspect the emergency pharmaceutical supplies container and the emergency medical system supplies of a health care facility licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 319, Sec. 2.   (SB 1039)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a hospital pharmacy serving a health care facility licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code may furnish a dangerous drug or dangerous device pursuant to preprinted or electronic standing orders, order sets, and protocols established under the policies and procedures of the health
 care facility,
 as approved according to the policies of the health care facility’s governing body, if the order is dated, timed, and authenticated in the medical record of the patient to whom the dangerous drug or dangerous device will be provided.

(b) A health care facility shall store and maintain drugs in accordance with national standards regarding the storage area and refrigerator or freezer temperature, and otherwise pursuant to the manufacturer’s guidelines. The health care facility’s policies and procedures shall specify these storage parameters.

(c) An intern pharmacist under the direct
 supervision and control, as defined in Section 4023.5, of a pharmacist, may inspect the drugs maintained in the health care facility at least once per month. The health care facility shall establish specific written policies and procedures for inspections pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) For purposes of this section, “health care facility” means a health facility licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 319, Sec. 3.   (SB 1039)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.8.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacy may furnish naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist to a school district, county office of education, or charter school pursuant to Section 49414.3 of the Education Code if all of the following are met:

(1) The naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist is furnished exclusively for use at a school district schoolsite, county office of education schoolsite, or charter school.

(2) A physician and surgeon provides a written order that specifies the quantity of naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist to be furnished.

(b) Records regarding the acquisition and disposition of naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist furnished pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be maintained by the school district, county office of education, or charter school for a period of three years from the date the records were created. The school district, county office of education, or charter school shall be responsible for monitoring the supply of naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist and ensuring the destruction of expired naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 557, Sec. 1.   (AB 1748)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.9.

Notwithstanding any other law, a pharmacy, wholesaler, or manufacturer may furnish naloxone hydrochloride or other opioid
 antagonists to a law enforcement agency if both of the following are met:

(a) The naloxone hydrochloride or other opioid antagonist is furnished exclusively for use by employees of the law enforcement agency who have completed training, provided by the law enforcement agency, in administering naloxone hydrochloride or other opioid
 antagonists.

(b) Records regarding the acquisition and disposition of naloxone hydrochloride or other opioid antagonists furnished pursuant to this section shall be maintained by the law enforcement agency for a period of three years from the date the records were created. The law enforcement agency shall be responsible for monitoring the supply of naloxone hydrochloride or
 other opioid antagonists and ensuring the destruction of expired naloxone hydrochloride or other opioid antagonists.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 259, Sec. 1.   (AB 2256)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4120.

(a) A nonresident pharmacy shall not sell or distribute dangerous drugs or dangerous devices in this state through any person or media, other than a wholesaler or third-party logistics provider who has obtained a license pursuant to this chapter or through a selling or distribution outlet that is licensed as a wholesaler or third-party logistics provider pursuant to this chapter, without registering as a nonresident pharmacy.

(b) Applications for a nonresident pharmacy registration shall be made on a form furnished by the board. The board may require any information the board deems reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(c) The
 Legislature, by enacting this section, does not intend a license issued to any nonresident pharmacy pursuant to this section to change or affect the tax liability imposed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 23501) of Part 11 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code on any nonresident pharmacy.

(d) The Legislature, by enacting this section, does not intend a license issued to any nonresident pharmacy pursuant to this section to serve as any evidence that the nonresident pharmacy is doing business within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 6.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

4121.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 651, an advertisement of the retail price for a drug that requires a prescription shall be limited to quantities of the drug that are consistent with good medical practice and shall include the strength, dosage form, and the exact dates during which the advertised price will be in effect.

(b) This section shall not apply to a pharmacy that is located in a licensed hospital and that is accessible only to hospital medical staff and personnel.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4122.

(a) In every pharmacy there shall be prominently posted in a place conspicuous to, and readable by, prescription drug consumers a notice provided by the board concerning the availability of prescription price information, the possibility of generic drug product selection, the type of services provided by pharmacies, and a statement describing patients’ rights relative to the requirements imposed on pharmacists pursuant to Section 733. The format and wording of the notice shall be adopted by the board by regulation. A written receipt that contains the required information on the notice may be provided to consumers as an alternative to posting the notice in the pharmacy.

(b) A pharmacist, or a pharmacist’s employee, shall give the current retail price for any drug sold at the pharmacy upon request from a consumer, however that request is communicated to the pharmacist or employee.

(c) If a requester requests price information on more than five prescription drugs and does not have valid prescriptions for all of the drugs for which price information is requested, a pharmacist may require the requester to meet any or all of the following requirements:

(1) The request shall be in writing.

(2) The pharmacist shall respond to the written request within a reasonable period of time. A reasonable period of time is deemed to be 10 days, or the time period stated in the written request, whichever is later.

(3) A pharmacy may charge a reasonable fee for each price quotation, as long as the requester is informed that there will be a fee charged.

(4) No pharmacy shall be required to respond to more than three requests as described in this subdivision from any one person or entity in a six-month period.

(d) This section shall not apply to a pharmacy that is located in a licensed hospital and that is accessible only to hospital medical staff and personnel.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no pharmacy shall be required to do any of the following:

(1) Provide the price of any controlled substance in response to a telephone request.

(2) Respond to a request from a competitor.

(3) Respond to a request from an out-of-state requester.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4123.

Any pharmacy that contracts to compound a drug for parenteral therapy, pursuant to a prescription, for delivery to another pharmacy shall report that contractual arrangement to the board. That information shall be reported by the pharmacy performing the compounding services within 30 days of commencing that compounding.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4124.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 2543, a pharmacist may dispense replacement contact lenses pursuant to a valid prescription of a physician or optometrist. Nothing in this section authorizes a pharmacist to conduct an examination of the eyes or to fit or adjust contact lenses. For purposes of this section, “replacement contact lenses” means soft contact lenses that require no fitting or adjustment, and that are dispensed as packaged and sealed by the manufacturer.

(b) No replacement contact lenses may be sold or dispensed except pursuant to a prescription that meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Conforms to state and federal statutes and regulations governing those prescriptions and includes the name, address, and state license number of the prescribing practitioner.

(2) Explicitly states an expiration date of not more than one year from the date of the last prescribing examination.

(3) Explicitly states that the prescription is for contact lenses and includes the lens brand name, type, and tint, including all specifications necessary for the ordering of lenses.

(c) The contact lenses that are dispensed shall be the exact contact lenses that have been prescribed, and no substitutions shall be made.

(d) Any pharmacist and pharmacy that dispenses replacement contact lenses shall direct the patient to confer with his or her eyecare practitioner in the event of any eye problem or reaction to the lenses.

(e) Any pharmacist and pharmacy that sells replacement contact lenses shall provide the following or substantially equivalent written notification to the patient whenever contact lenses are supplied:

WARNING: IF YOU ARE HAVING ANY UNEXPLAINED EYE DISCOMFORT, WATERING, VISION CHANGE, OR REDNESS, REMOVE YOUR LENSES IMMEDIATELY AND CONSULT YOUR EYE CARE PRACTITIONER BEFORE WEARING YOUR LENSES AGAIN.

(f) Any pharmacy and pharmacist dispensing replacement contact lenses shall be subject to all statutes, regulations, and ordinances governing the advertisement of contact lenses. In addition, any advertisement by a pharmacy or pharmacist that mentions replacement contact lenses shall include within the advertisement all fees, charges, and costs associated with the purchase of the lenses from that pharmacy and pharmacist.

(g) Any pharmacy dispensing replacement contact lenses shall register with the Medical Board of California at the time of initial application for a license or at the time of annual renewal of that license.

(h) All nonresident pharmacies shall maintain records of replacement contact lenses shipped, mailed, or delivered to persons in California for a period of at least three years. The records shall be available for inspection upon request by the board or the Division of Licensing of the Medical Board of California.

(i) The requirements of this section are applicable to nonresident pharmacies as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4112. A nonresident pharmacy may dispense contact lenses only as provided in this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 890, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

4125.

(a) Every pharmacy shall establish a quality assurance program that shall, at a minimum, document medication errors attributable, in whole or in part, to the pharmacy or its personnel. The purpose of the quality assurance program shall be to assess errors that occur in the pharmacy in dispensing or furnishing prescription medications so that the pharmacy may take appropriate action to prevent a recurrence.

(b) Records generated for and maintained as a component of a pharmacy’s ongoing quality assurance program shall be considered peer review documents and not subject to discovery in any arbitration, civil, or other proceeding, except as provided hereafter. That privilege shall not prevent review of a pharmacy’s quality assurance program and records maintained as part of that system by the board as necessary to protect the public health and safety or if fraud is alleged by a government agency with jurisdiction over the pharmacy. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a patient from accessing his or her own prescription records. Nothing in this section shall affect the discoverability of any records not solely generated for and maintained as a component of a pharmacy’s ongoing quality assurance program.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2002.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 677, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Section operative January 1, 2002, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4126.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a covered entity may contract with a pharmacy to provide pharmacy services to patients of the covered entity, as defined in Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code, including dispensing preferentially priced drugs obtained pursuant to Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code. Contracts between those covered entities and pharmacies shall comply with guidelines published by the Health Resources and Services Administration and shall be available for inspection by board staff during normal business hours.

(b) Drugs purchased pursuant to Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code and received by a pharmacy shall be segregated from the pharmacy’s other drug stock by either physical or electronic means. All records of acquisition and disposition of these drugs shall be readily retrievable in a form separate from the pharmacy’s other records.

(c) Drugs obtained by a pharmacy to be dispensed to patients of a covered entity pursuant to Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code that cannot be distributed because of a change in circumstances for the covered entity or the pharmacy shall be returned to the distributor from which they were obtained. For the purposes of this section, a change in circumstances includes, but is not limited to, the termination or expiration of the contract between the pharmacy and the covered entity, the closure of a pharmacy, disciplinary action against the pharmacy, or closure of the covered entity.

(d) A licensee that participates in a contract to dispense preferentially priced drugs pursuant to this section shall not have both a pharmacy and a wholesaler license.

(e) Neither a covered entity nor a pharmacy shall be required to obtain a license as a wholesaler based on acts reasonably necessary to fully participate in the drug purchase program established by Section 256b of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 631, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

4126.5.

(a) A pharmacy may furnish dangerous drugs only to the following:

(1) A wholesaler owned or under common control by the wholesaler from whom the dangerous drug was acquired.

(2) The pharmaceutical manufacturer from whom the dangerous drug was acquired.

(3) A licensed wholesaler acting as a reverse distributor.

(4) Another pharmacy or wholesaler to alleviate a temporary shortage of a dangerous drug that could result in the denial of health care. A pharmacy furnishing dangerous drugs pursuant to this
 paragraph may only furnish a quantity sufficient to alleviate the temporary shortage.

(5) A patient or to another pharmacy pursuant to a prescription or as otherwise authorized by law.

(6) A health care provider that is not a pharmacy but that is authorized to purchase dangerous drugs.

(7) To another pharmacy under common control. During a proclaimed state of emergency, “another pharmacy” as used in this paragraph shall include a mobile pharmacy, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 4062.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), or any other law, a clinic licensed under Section 4180 may furnish dangerous drugs to any of the following during a proclaimed
 state of emergency:

(1) Another clinic or wholesaler to alleviate a temporary shortage of a dangerous drug that could result in the denial of health care. A clinic furnishing dangerous drugs pursuant to this paragraph may only furnish a quantity sufficient to alleviate the temporary shortage.

(2) A patient pursuant to a prescription or as otherwise authorized by law.

(3) A health care provider that is not a clinic but that is authorized to purchase dangerous drugs.

(4) To another clinic under common control, including a mobile clinic, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 4062.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a violation of this section may subject the person or persons who committed the violation to a fine not to exceed the amount specified in Section 125.9 for each occurrence pursuant to a citation issued by the board.

(d) Amounts due from any person under this section on or after January 1, 2005, shall be offset as provided under Section 12419.5 of the Government Code. Amounts received by the board under this section shall be deposited into the Pharmacy Board Contingent Fund.

(e) For purposes of this section, “common control” means the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of another person whether by ownership, by voting rights, by contract, or by other means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 716, Sec. 4.   (AB 2576)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4126.8.

The compounding of drug preparations by a pharmacy for furnishing, distribution, or use in this state shall be consistent with standards established in the pharmacy compounding chapters of the current version of the United States Pharmacopeia-National Formulary, including relevant testing and quality assurance. The board may adopt regulations to impose additional standards for compounding drug preparations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 184, Sec. 1.   (AB 973)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4126.9.

(a) A pharmacy that issues a recall notice regarding a nonsterile compounded drug product shall, in addition to any other duties, contact the recipient pharmacy, prescriber, or patient of the recalled drug and the board within 12 hours of the recall notice if both of the following apply:

(1) Use of or exposure to the recalled drug may cause serious adverse health consequences or death.

(2) The recalled drug was dispensed, or is intended for use, in this state.

(b) A recall notice issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be made as follows:

(1) If the recalled drug was dispensed directly to the patient, the notice shall be made to the patient.

(2) If the recalled drug was dispensed directly to the prescriber, the notice shall be made to the prescriber, who shall ensure the patient is notified.

(3) If the recalled drug was dispensed directly to a pharmacy, the notice shall be made to the pharmacy, which shall notify the prescriber or patient, as appropriate. If the pharmacy notifies the prescriber, the prescriber shall ensure the patient is notified.

(c) A pharmacy that has been advised that a patient has been harmed by using a nonsterile compounded product potentially attributable to the pharmacy shall report the event to MedWatch within 72 hours of the pharmacy being
 advised.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 22.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4126.10.

(a) A pharmacy located in California may distribute compounded human drug preparations interstate only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Between January 1 and March 31 of each year, the pharmacy reports all required data for the previous calendar year into the Information Sharing Network established by the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy in conjunction with the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) to implement the Memorandum of Understanding Addressing Certain Distributions of Compounded Human Drug Products.

(2) On an annual basis, in connection with and as a condition of renewal
 of the pharmacy’s license, the pharmacist-in-charge of the pharmacy certifies that the reporting requirements of paragraph (1) have been satisfied.

(3) The pharmacy reports any adverse drug experience and product quality issue for any compounded product to the board within 12 hours after the pharmacy receives notice of the adverse drug experience or product quality issue.

(b) Information reported by the board to the FDA directly or through the Information Sharing Network established by the National Association of Boards of Pharmacy in conjunction with the FDA to implement the Memorandum of Understanding Addressing Certain Distributions of Compounded Human Drug Products shall not be subject to public disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with
 Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 5.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7.5. Sterile Drug Products [4127. - 4127.8.]

4127.

(a) A pharmacy that compounds sterile drug products shall possess a sterile compounding pharmacy license as provided in this article.

(b) The board shall adopt regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to establish policies, guidelines, and procedures to implement this article.

(c) The board shall review any formal revision to General Chapter 797 of the United States Pharmacopeia and The National Formulary (USP–NF), relating to the compounding of sterile preparations, not later than 90 days after the revision becomes official, to
 determine whether amendments are necessary for the regulations adopted by the board pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 484, Sec. 23.   (SB 1193)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4127.1.

(a) A pharmacy shall not compound sterile drug products unless the pharmacy has obtained a sterile compounding pharmacy license from the board pursuant to this section. The license shall be renewed annually and is not transferable.

(b) A license to compound sterile drug products shall be issued only to a location that is licensed as a pharmacy and shall be issued only to the owner of the pharmacy licensed at that location.

(c) A license to compound sterile drug products shall not be issued or renewed until the location is inspected by the board and found in compliance with this article and regulations adopted by
 the board.

(d) A license to compound sterile drug products shall not be issued or renewed until the board does all of the following:

(1) Reviews a current copy of the pharmacy’s policies and procedures for sterile compounding.

(2) Reviews the pharmacy’s completed self-assessment form required by Section 1735.2 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) Is provided with copies of all inspection reports conducted of the pharmacy’s premises, and any reports from a private accrediting agency, conducted in the prior 12 months documenting the pharmacy’s operations.

(4) Receives a list of all sterile medications compounded by the pharmacy since the last license renewal.

(e) A pharmacy licensed pursuant to this section shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide to the board a copy of any disciplinary or other action taken by another state within 10 days of the action.

(2) Notify the board within 10 days of the suspension of any accreditation held by the pharmacy.

(3) Provide to the board, within 12 hours, any recall notice issued by the pharmacy for sterile drug products it has compounded.

(f) Adverse effects reported or potentially attributable to a pharmacy’s
 sterile drug product shall be reported to the board within 12 hours and immediately reported to the MedWatch program of the federal Food and Drug Administration.

(g) The reconstitution of a sterile powder shall not require a license pursuant to this section if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The sterile powder was obtained from a manufacturer.

(2) The drug is reconstituted for administration to patients by a health care professional licensed to administer drugs by injection pursuant to this division.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 4) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 565, Sec. 5.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4127.15.

Subject to the requirements of this section, the board may issue a license to a hospital satellite compounding pharmacy. The license fee and annual renewal fee shall be in an amount established by the board in subdivision (u) of Section 4400. The license shall not be transferable.

(a) A hospital satellite compounding pharmacy license shall not be issued or renewed until the location is inspected by the board and found to be in compliance with this article and regulations adopted by the board.

(1) A hospital satellite compounding pharmacy shall compound sterile drug products for administration only to registered hospital patients
 who are on the premises of the same physical plant in which the hospital satellite compounding pharmacy is located.

(2) The services provided shall be directly related to the services or treatment plan administered in the physical plant.

(b) A hospital satellite compounding pharmacy license shall not be issued or renewed until the board does all of the following:

(1) Reviews a current copy of the hospital satellite compounding pharmacy’s policies and procedures for sterile compounding.

(2) Reviews the hospital satellite compounding pharmacy’s completed self-assessment form as described in Section 1735.2 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) Receives a list of all products compounded by the hospital satellite compounding pharmacy since the last license renewal.

(c) A hospital satellite compounding pharmacy shall do all of the following:

(1) Purchase, procure, or otherwise obtain all components through the license of the hospital pharmacy as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 4029.

(2) Satisfy the ratio of not less than one pharmacist on duty for a total of two pharmacy technicians on duty.

(3) Ensure immediate supervision, as defined in Section 70065 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, by a pharmacist of licensed
 ancillary staff involved in sterile compounding.

(4) Provide to the board, within 12 hours, any recall notice issued by the hospital satellite compounding pharmacy for sterile drug products it has compounded.

(5) Report to the board, within 12 hours, adverse effects reported or potentially attributable to the sterile drug products compounded by the hospital satellite compounding pharmacy. Unexpected adverse effects shall also be, within 12 hours, reported to the MedWatch program of the federal Food and Drug Administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 351)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4127.2.

(a) A nonresident pharmacy shall not compound sterile drug products for shipment into this state without a sterile compounding pharmacy license issued by the board pursuant to this section. The license shall be renewed annually and shall not be transferable.

(b) A license to compound sterile drug products shall be issued only to a location that is licensed as a nonresident pharmacy and shall be issued only to the owner of the nonresident pharmacy licensed at that location.

(c) A license to compound sterile drug products shall not be issued or renewed until the location is inspected by the board and found
 in compliance with this article and any regulations adopted by the board. The nonresident pharmacy shall reimburse the board for all actual and necessary costs incurred by the board in conducting an inspection of the pharmacy at least once annually pursuant to subdivision (v) of Section 4400.

(d) A license to compound sterile drug products shall not be issued or renewed until the board does all of the following:

(1) Reviews a current copy of the nonresident pharmacy’s policies and procedures for sterile compounding.

(2) Reviews the pharmacy’s completed self-assessment form required by Section 1735.2 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) Is
 provided with copies of all inspection reports conducted of the nonresident pharmacy’s premises, and any reports from a private accrediting agency, conducted in the prior 12 months documenting the nonresident pharmacy’s operations.

(4) Receives a list of all sterile drug products compounded by the pharmacy within the prior 12 months.

(e) A pharmacy licensed pursuant to this section shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide to the board a copy of any disciplinary or other action taken by its state of residence or another state within 10 days of the action.

(2) Notify the board within 10 days of the suspension of any accreditation held by the pharmacy.

(3) Provide to the board, within 12 hours, any recall notice issued by the pharmacy for sterile drug products it has compounded that have been shipped into, or dispensed in, California.

(4) Advise the board of any complaint it receives from a provider, pharmacy, or patient in California.

(f) Adverse effects reported or potentially attributable to a nonresident pharmacy’s sterile compounded drug product shall be reported to the board within 12 hours and immediately reported to the MedWatch program of the federal Food and Drug Administration.

(g) On or before January 1, 2018, the board shall provide a report to the Legislature regarding the regulation of nonresident pharmacies. The report shall be submitted to the Legislature in the manner required pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code. At a minimum, the report shall address all of the following:

(1) A detailed description of board activities related to the inspection and licensure of nonresident pharmacies.

(2) Whether fee revenue collected pursuant to subdivision (v) of Section 4400 and travel cost reimbursements collected pursuant to subdivision (c) of this section provide revenue in an amount sufficient to support the board’s activities related to the inspection and licensure of nonresident pharmacies.

(3) The status of proposed
 changes to federal law that are under serious consideration and that would govern compounding pharmacies, including legislation pending before the United States Congress, administrative rules, regulations, or orders under consideration by the federal Food and Drug Administration or other appropriate federal agency, and cases pending before the courts.

(4) If applicable, recommended modifications to the board’s statutory duties related to nonresident pharmacies as a result of changes to federal law or any additional modifications necessary to protect the health and safety of the public.

(h) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (g) is inoperative on January 1, 2022, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 565, Sec. 7.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative July 1, 2014, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4127.3.

(a) Whenever the board has a reasonable belief, based on information obtained during an inspection or investigation by the board, that a pharmacy compounding sterile drug products poses an immediate threat to the public health or safety, the executive officer of the board may issue an order to the pharmacy to immediately cease and desist from compounding sterile drug products. The cease and desist order shall remain in effect for no more than 30 days or the date of a hearing seeking an interim suspension order, whichever is earlier.

(b) Whenever the board issues a cease and desist order pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall immediately issue the owner a notice setting forth the acts or omissions with which the owner is charged, specifying the pertinent code
 section or sections.
